California, session 20252026, AB1929.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Many health care service plans and health insurers in California receive significant public benefits through tax credits, regulatory privileges, and participation in publicly supported programs such as Covered California.(b) Californians pay billions of dollars annually in health insurance premiums to health care service plans and health insurers with the expectation that those funds will be used primarily to support patient care and the delivery of health services.(c) Consumers, policymakers, and the public currently have limited visibility into how health care service plans and health insurers invest their financial reserves and surplus funds.(d) Greater transparency regarding investment holdings will help ensure accountability, inform public policy discussions, and strengthen public trust in California’s health care system.(e) Providing public access to investment disclosures will allow consumers and policymakers to better understand how health care entities manage significant financial assets derived from patient premiums.SEC. 2.Article 10.9 (commencing with Section 1399.67) is added to Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, to read:10.9.Health Care Service Plan Investment Transparency1399.67.(a)A health care service plan regulated by the department shall annually disclose its material investment holdings to the department.(b)(1)The initial disclosure required by this section shall include material investment holdings covering the five calendar years prior to January 1, 2027.(2)Following the initial disclosure, each health care service plan shall update its disclosure annually to include material investment holdings for the immediately preceding calendar year.(3)Annual disclosures shall be submitted to the department on or before July 1 of each year, unless otherwise specified by regulation, beginning on July 1, 2027.(c)The department shall prominently display, and make accessible to the public, the disclosures required by this section on the department’s internet website.(d)For purposes of this section, “material investment holding” means a direct or indirect ownership interest, financial stake, or beneficial interest in an entity, fund, asset, or investment vehicle that, individually or in the aggregate, is of such significance that a reasonable person would consider it important in evaluating the financial position, priorities, or potential conflicts of interest of the reporting health care service plan.1399.68.(a)If a health care service plan fails to comply with the disclosure requirements of Section 1399.67 within 30 days of the reporting deadline, the department shall assess a civil penalty against the plan.(b)The civil penalty in subdivision (a) shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day the health care service plan remains out of compliance following the 30-day grace period.(c)(1)A health care service plan that fails to comply with Section 1399.67 shall prominently post a notice on its public internet website stating that the plan is not in compliance with California law requiring disclosure of investment holdings.(2)The department and Covered California shall prominently post the plan’s noncompliance status on their internet websites until compliance is achieved.SEC. 3.Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 10609.1) is added to Part 2 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, to read:7.5.Health Insurer Investment Transparency10609.1.(a)A health insurer regulated by the department shall annually disclose its material investment holdings to the department.(b)(1)The initial disclosure required by this section shall include material investment holdings covering the five calendar years prior to January 1, 2027.(2)Following the initial disclosure, each health insurer shall update its disclosure annually to include material investment holdings for the immediately preceding calendar year.(3)Annual disclosures shall be submitted to the department on or before July 1 of each year, unless otherwise specified by regulation, beginning on July 1, 2027.(c)The department shall prominently display, and make accessible to the public, the disclosures required by this section on the department’s internet website.(d)For purposes of this section, “material investment holding” means a direct or indirect ownership interest, financial stake, or beneficial interest in an entity, fund, asset, or investment vehicle that, individually or in the aggregate, is of such significance that a reasonable person would consider it important in evaluating the financial position, priorities, or potential conflicts of interest of the reporting health insurer.10609.2.(a)If a health insurer fails to comply with the disclosure requirements of Section 10609.1 within 30 days of the reporting deadline, the department shall assess a civil penalty against the insurer.(b)The civil penalty in subdivision (a) shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day the health insurer remains out of compliance following the 30-day grace period.(c)(1)A health insurer that fails to comply with Section 10609.1 shall prominently post a notice on its public internet website stating that the insurer is not in compliance with California law requiring disclosure of investment holdings.(2)The department and Covered California shall prominently post the insurer’s noncompliance status on their internet websites until compliance is achieved.SEC. 4.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 2. Section 100524 is added to the Government Code, immediately following Section 100523, to read:100524. (a) A carrier participating in the Exchange shall annually disclose its material investment holdings to the Exchange. The disclosure shall include both of the following:(1) The 25 largest investment holdings of the carrier, regardless of whether or not those holdings are reported through a Form 5500 filed with the United States Department of Labor, other regulatory filing, subsidiary, affiliate, pooled investment vehicle, or other investment structure.(2) A copy of the carrier’s Form 5500 filed with the United States Department of Labor.(b) (1) The initial disclosure required by subdivision (a) shall include material investment holdings covering the five calendar years before January 1, 2027.(2) Following the initial disclosure, a carrier shall update its disclosure annually to include material investment holdings for the immediately preceding calendar year.(3) Annual disclosures shall be submitted to the Exchange on or before July 1 of each year, unless otherwise specified by regulation, beginning on July 1, 2027.(c) The Exchange shall prominently display, and make accessible to the public, the disclosures required by this section and the carrier’s Form 5500 on the Exchange’s internet website.(d) (1) If a carrier fails to comply with the disclosure requirements of this section within 30 days of the reporting deadline, the Exchange shall assess an administrative penalty against the carrier.(2) The administrative penalty shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day for each day the carrier remains out of compliance following the 30-day grace period.(3) A carrier that fails to comply with the disclosure requirements of this section shall prominently post a notice on its public internet website stating that the carrier is not in compliance with California law requiring disclosure of investment holdings.(4) The Exchange shall prominently post the carrier’s noncompliance status on its internet website until compliance is achieved.(e) For purposes of this section, “material investment holdings” means investments the carrier has made in a calendar year that are a direct or indirect ownership interest, financial stake, or beneficial interest in an entity, fund, asset, or investment vehicle.